Florida, session 2026, SB568.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 15 16 Section 1.âParagraphs (p) and (q) are added to subsection 17 (2) of section 409.967, Florida Statutes, to read: 18 409.967âManaged care plan accountability.â 19 (2)âThe agency shall establish such contract requirements 20 as are necessary for the operation of the statewide managed care 21 program. In addition to any other provisions the agency may deem 22 necessary, the contract must require: 23 (p)âPrior authorization reviews.âFor any claims in which a 24 Medicaid managed care plan has given prior authorization, 25 prepayment or postpayment review may not include review for 26 medical necessity for the previously approved equipment, 27 supplies, or services. 28 (q)âDurable medical equipment.âManaged care plans, or their 29 subcontractors, shall provide coverage for durable medical 30 equipment or complex rehabilitation technology from any 31 qualified durable medical equipment or complex rehabilitation 32 technology provider within the provider network which the 33 enrollee chooses. The agency shall adopt rules to implement this 34 paragraph, including, but not limited to: 35 1.âAuthorizing enrollees to choose the provider, within the 36 provider network, from which they can receive eligible durable 37 medical equipment or complex rehabilitation technology. 38 2.âProviding a procedure within the grievance resolution 39 process adopted under paragraph (h) for enrollees to file a 40 complaint if they believe they were not granted authority to 41 choose their provider from within the provider network, as 42 authorized under this paragraph. 43 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.